Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-408
Courthouse bonds; election; procedure.

The election at which any such proposition shall be voted upon shall in all respects be conducted and the returns shall be canvassed and declared in the manner now provided by law for such purposes at general elections held in such cities.

Laws 1889, c. 9, § 2, p. 82;

R.S.1913, § 412;

C.S.1922, § 329;

C.S.1929, § 11-408;

R.S.1943, § 10-408.